da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenredskaber: Forklæder; Bagespader; Køkkenpipetter; Køkkenpensler; Drikkevarer Dispenser; Smørdispensere; Kagedekoration – tilbehør; Kageservering; Dåseknusere; Dåseåbnere; Forskærergafler; Juliennejern; Dørslag og sigter; Krydderibeholdere; Småkageforme; Kagesprøjter; Tilbehør til stegetermometer; Stegetermometre; Æggeure; Flamberingsbrændere; Afkølingsriste; Skærebrætter; Opvaskestativer og opvaskebakker; Dejskærere; Elektrisk kniv – tilbehør; Elektriske knive; Melsigter; Skabeloner til dekoration af mad og drikkevarer; Spisekiks; Fødevarebeholdere; Rivejern; Skrælleknive; Poser til dampning af fødevarer; Madpinde og kødnåle; Tragte; Hvidløgspressere; Geléforme; Isterningbakker; Krusåbnere; Sprøjtepistoler til kød; Køkkenknive; Køkkenforme; Køkkenopbevaring; Køkkenvægte; Køkkenskrabere; Køkkensakse; Køkkensnittere; Køkkenbestiksæt; Øseskeer; Mosere; Målekopper og -skeer; Kødmørning; Røreskåle; Mortere og stødere; Olie- og eddikebeholdere; Stegeposer; Grydelapper; Pastaforme og -stempler; Dejblandere; Underlag til udrulning af dej; Tilbehør til pizzaskærere; Pizzahjul; Grovmosere; Kagerulle – tilbehør; Kageruller; Salatdressing – blandere og shakere; Salatslynger; Opøserskeer; Opbevaring til vasken; Måtter og riste til vasken; Hulskeer; Spatler; Krydderikværn – tilbehør; Krydderikværne; Spiralizers; Skeholdere; Sukkerskåle; Sushimåtter; Tesier; Køkkentænger; Piskeris
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské náradie a riad: Zástery; Lopatky na pizzu; Kuchynské pipety; Maslovačky; Dávkovače nápojov; Dávkovače masla; Potreby na zdobenie tort; Servírovacie lopatky na zákusky; Lisy na plechovky; Otvárače na konzervy; Kuchynské vidlice; Ozdobné nože; Cedníky a sitká; Dávkovače omáčok; Vykrajovačky sušienok; Lisy na sušienky; Príslušenstvo ku kuchynskému teplomeru; Kuchynské teplomery; Časovače varenia; Flambovacie pištole; Mriežky na chladenie; Dosky na krájanie; Stojany a odkvapkávače na riad; Vykrajovacie kolieska; Príslušenstvo pre elektrické nože; Elektrické nože; Preosievače múky; Šablóny na zdobenie jedla a nápojov; Kliešte na jedlo; Zásobníky na potraviny; Krájače a strúhadlá na potraviny; Škrabky na potraviny a vykrajovače jaderníkov; Potravinové vrecká na naparovanie; Napichovadlá a špízy na potraviny; Lieviky; Lisy na cesnak; Želatínové formy; Formy na ľad; Otvárače na zaváraniny; Plničky klobás; Kuchynské nože; Kuchynské formy; Kuchynské organizéry; Kuchynské váhy; Kuchynské stierky; Kuchynské nožnice; Kuchynské krájače; Súpravy kuchynského riadu; Naberačky; Lisy na pyré; Odmerky a odmerné lyžice; Tenderizéry mäsa; Misky na šľahanie; Mažiare s paličkou; Dávkovače oleja a octu; Vrecká na pečenie; Rukavice a držiaky na hrnce; Formičky a vykrajovačky na cestoviny; Hnetače na cesto; Utierky na cesto; Príslušenstvo k nožom na pizzu; Nože na pizzu; Pasírovače; Príslušenstvo k valčekom; Valčeky; Mixéry a šejkry na šalátové dressingy; Odstredivky na šalát; Naberačky; Stojany na čistiace potreby; Podložky a mriežky do dresu; Dierované lyžice; Špachtle; Príslušenstvo k mlynčeku na korenie; Mlynčeky na korenie; Špiralizéry; Držiak lyžice; Dózy na cukor; Podložky na sushi; Čajové sitká; Kliešte; Metličky
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenverktøy og bestikk: Forkler; Bakeark; Kalkunsprøyter; Marinadepensler; Drikkedispensere; Smørdispensere; Utstyr for kakedekorering; Kakeservering; Boksknusere; Boksåpnere; Serveringsgafler; Kanalkniver; Kolandere og siler; Tilbehørsdispensere; Kakekuttere; Kakepresser; Tilbehør til matlagningstermometere; Matlagningstermometere; Matlagningstimere; Gassbrennere til matlagning; Kjølestativer; Skjærebrett; Oppvaskstativer og avrenningsbrett; Deighjul; Tilbehør til elektriske kniver; Elektriske kniver; Melsiler; Mat- og drikkestensiler; Knekkeverktøy; Matdispensere; Rivjern og zestere; Skrellere og kjerneuttakere; Dampposer for matbruk; Matpinner og -spyd; Trakter; Hvitløkspresser; Geléformer; Isbitformer; Krukkeåpnere; Jerkypistoler; Kjøkkenkniver; Kjøkkenformer; Kjøkkenorganisering; Kjøkkenvekter; Kjøkkenskraper; Kjøkkensakser; Kjøkkenkniver; Sett med kjøkkenutstyr; Øser; Presser; Målekopper og -skjeer; Kjøttmørningsutstyr; Blandeboller; Mortere og pistiller; Olje- og eddikdispensere; Ovnposer; Grytevotter og gryteholdere; Pastaformer og -stempler; Blandeverktøy til baking; Bakehåndklær; Tilbehør til pizzaskjærere; Pizzaskjærere; Potetmoser; Tilbehør til kjevler; Kjevler; Salatdressingmiksere og -shakere; Salatspinnere; Serveringsskjeer; Vaskorganisatorer; Vaskematter og -nett; Skjeer med slisser; Stekespader; Tilbehør til krydderkverner; Krydderkverner; Spiralkniver; Skjestativer; Sukkerdispensere; Sushimatter; Tesiler; Klyper; Visper
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องมือและเครื่องใช้ในครัว: ผ้ากันเปื้อน; ถาดรองพิซซ่า; หลอดหยด; แปรงทา; ที่จ่ายเครื่องดื่ม; เครื่องจ่ายเนย; อุปกรณ์แต่งหน้าเค้ก; ที่เสิร์ฟเค้ก; เครื่องอัดกระป๋อง; ที่เปิดกระป๋อง; ส้อมขนาดใหญ่; มีดแชนเนล; กระชอนและที่กรอง; ที่จ่ายเครื่องปรุงอาหาร; ที่ตัดคุกกี้; ที่กดคุกกี้; อุปกรณ์วัดอุณหภูมิอาหาร; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิสำหรับทำอาหาร; ที่จับเวลาทำอาหาร; คบไฟสำหรับประกอบอาหาร; ตะแกรงพัก; เขียง; ชั้นและที่คว่ำจาน; ที่ตัดแป้ง; อุปกรณ์มีดไฟฟ้า; มีดไฟฟ้า; ที่ร่อนแป้ง; ลายฉลุสำหรับอาหารและเครื่องดื่ม; ที่หนีบก้ามปู; ที่จ่ายอาหาร; ที่ขูดและที่ปอก; ที่ปอกและที่คว้านเม็ด; ถุงทำอาหารด้วยไอน้ำ; ไม้เสียบอาหาร; กรวย; ที่บดกระเทียม; แม่พิมพ์เจละติน; ถาดทำน้ำแข็ง; ที่เปิดขวดโหล; ปืนสำหรับเนื้อแดดเดียว; มีดทำครัว; แม่พิมพ์ทำอาหาร; ตู้เก็บเครื่องครัว; เครื่องชั่งในครัว; ที่ขูดสำหรับครัว; กรรไกรทำครัว; เครื่องหั่นเนื้อสัตว์สำหรับใช้ในครัว; ชุดช้อนส้อม; ทัพพี; ที่บด; ถ้วยและช้อนตวง; ค้อนทุบเนื้อ; ชามผสมอาหาร; ครกและสาก; ที่จ่ายน้ำมันและน้ำส้มสายชู; ถุงเตาอบ; ถุงมือกันความร้อนและผ้าจับหม้อ; แม่พิมพ์และสแตมป์สำหรับพาสต้า; ที่ตัดเนย; ผ้าขนมอบ; อุปกรณ์ที่ตัดพิซซ่า; ที่ตัดพิซซ่า; ไรเซอร์; อุปกรณ์ไม้นวดแป้ง; ไม้นวดแป้ง; ที่ผสมน้ำสลัด; เครื่องปั่นสลัด; ช้อนตัก; ที่ใส่ของสำหรับอ่างล้างจาน; แผ่นและตะแกรงสำหรับอ่างล้างจาน; ช้อนมีรู; พายตักอาหาร; อุปกรณ์เครื่องบดเครื่องเทศ; ที่บดเครื่องเทศ; เครื่องหั่นผักแบบเกลียว; ที่วางช้อน; อุปกรณ์ใส่น้ำตาล; เสื่อไม้ไผ่ม้วนซูชิ; ที่กรองชา; ที่คีบ; ที่ตีไข่
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksverktyg och köksgeråd: Förkläden; Pizzaspadar; Ösningsredskap; Ösningspenslar; Dryckesdispensrar; Smörautomater; Utrustning för tårtdekoration; Tårtspadar; Burkkrossare; Konservöppnare; Tranchergafflar; Garnityrknivar; Durkslag och silar; Såsbehållare; Kakformar; Spritspåsar; Tillbehör för kökstermometrar; Matlagningstermometrar; Äggklockor; Gasbrännare; Avsvalningsgaller; Skärbrädor; Diskställ och torkställ; Kaksporrar; Tillbehör till elektriska knivar; Elektriska knivar; Silar; Mat- och dryckesschabloner; Matknäckare; Matautomater; Mathyvlar och rivjärn; Matskalare och urkärningsverktyg; Påsar för ångkokning; Matspett; Trattar; Vitlökspressar; Gelatinformar; Isformar; Burköppnare; Jerkyspruta; Köksknivar; Köksformar; Köksorganiserare; Köksvågar; Köksskrapor; Kökssaxar; Köksskivare; Köksutrustningsset; Slevar; Pressar; Mått och måttskedar; Köttklubbor; Vispskålar; Mortlar och mortelstötar; Olje- och vinägerbehållare; Ugnspåsar; Grytlappar och grytvantar; Pastaformar och pastastansar; Smördegsblandare; Smördegsdukar; Tillbehör för pizzaskärare; Pizzaskärare; Potatispressar med presskål; Tillbehör till kavlar; Kavlar; Vispar och shakers för salladsdressing; Salladsslungor; Skopor; Diskhokorgar; Mattor och galler till diskhoar; Hålslevar; Stekspadar; Tillbehör till kryddkvarnar; Kryddkvarnar; Spiralskärare; Skedhållare; Sockerströare; Sushimattor; Tefilter; Kökstänger; Vispar
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски инструменти и прибори: Престилки; Лопати за печене; Кухненски пипети; Четки за намазване; Диспенсъри за напитки; Диспенсъри за масло; Консумативи за украса на торти; Прибори за сервиране на торта; Преси за мачкане на кенчета; Отварачки за консерви; Вилици за месо; Ножове за цитрусови кори; Гевгири и цедки; Диспенсъри за добавки; Формички за бисквити; Преси за бисквитки; Аксесоари за готварски термометър; Готварски термометри; Таймери за готвене; Готварски горелки; Решетки за охлаждане; Дъски за рязане; Сушилници за съдове и табли за отцеждане; Ролкови ножове за тесто; Аксесоари за електрически ножове; Електрически ножове; Сита за брашно; Шаблони за храни и напитки; Трошачки за храна; Диспенсъри за храна; Рендета за храна и корички; Белачки за храна и уреди за премахване на сърцевини; Торбички за варене на храна; Клечки и шишчета за храна; Фунии; Преси за чесън; Желатинови формички; Формички за лед; Отварачки за буркани; Шприц за месо; Кухненски ножове; Кухненски форми; Кухненски органайзери; Кухненски везни; Кухненски лопатки; Кухненски ножици; Кухненски резачки; Комплекти кухненски прибори; Черпаци; Уреди за пасиране; Мерителни чаши и лъжици; Чукчета за месо; Купи за смесване; Хаванчета и пестици; Диспенсъри за олио и оцет; Пликове за фурна; Ръкавици за фурна и поставки за тенджери; Форми и печати за паста; Блендери за сладкиши; Плат за точене на сладкарски изделия; Аксесоари за уреди за рязане на пица; Уреди за рязане на пица; Преса за пюре; Аксесоари за точилка; Точилки; Миксери и шейкъри за салатен дресинг; Центрофуги за салата; Загребващи лъжички; Органайзери за мивка; Подложки и решетки за мивки; Решетъчни лъжици; Шпатули; Аксесоари за мелници за подправки; Мелници за подправки; Спирализатори; Поставки за лъжици; Диспенсъри за захар; Подложки за суши; Цедки за чай; Щипки; Бъркалки
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Tools & Utensils: Aprons; Baking Peels; Basters; Basting Brushes; Beverage Dispensers; Butter Dispensers; Cake Decorating Supplies; Cake Servers; Can Crushers; Can Openers; Carving Forks; Channel Knives; Colanders & Strainers; Condiment Dispensers; Cookie Cutters; Cookie Presses; Cooking Thermometer Accessories; Cooking Thermometers; Cooking Timers; Cooking Torches; Cooling Racks; Cutting Boards; Dish Racks & Drain Boards; Dough Wheels; Electric Knife Accessories; Electric Knives; Flour Sifters; Food & Drink Stencils; Food Crackers; Food Dispensers; Food Graters & Zesters; Food Peelers & Corers; Food Steaming Bags; Food Sticks & Skewers; Funnels; Garlic Presses; Gelatin Molds; Ice Cube Trays; Jar Openers; Jerky Guns; Kitchen Knives; Kitchen Molds; Kitchen Organizers; Kitchen Scales; Kitchen Scrapers; Kitchen Shears; Kitchen Slicers; Kitchen Utensil Sets; Ladles; Mashers; Measuring Cups & Spoons; Meat Tenderizers; Mixing Bowls; Mortars & Pestles; Oil & Vinegar Dispensers; Oven Bags; Oven Mitts & Pot Holders; Pasta Molds & Stamps; Pastry Blenders; Pastry Cloths; Pizza Cutter Accessories; Pizza Cutters; Ricers; Rolling Pin Accessories; Rolling Pins; Salad Dressing Mixers & Shakers; Salad Spinners; Scoops; Sink Caddies; Sink Mats & Grids; Slotted Spoons; Spatulas; Spice Grinder Accessories; Spice Grinders; Spiralizers; Spoon Rests; Sugar Dispensers; Sushi Mats; Tea Strainers; Tongs; Whisks
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Εργαλεία & σκεύη κουζίνας: Ποδιές; Φτυάρια ψησίματος (πίτσας); Πινέλα μαγειρικής; Πινέλα επάλειψης; Διανομείς ποτών; Δοχεία βουτύρου; Είδη διακόσμησης τούρτας/κέικ; Σερβίτσια κέικ; Μηχανές σύνθλιψης κονσερβών; Ανοιχτήρια κονσερβών; Πιρούνια τεμαχισμού; Μαχαίρια γαρνιτούρας εσπεριδοειδών; Τρυπητά σκεύη κουζίνας & σουρωτήρια; Διανομείς καρυκευμάτων; Κόπτες μπισκότων; Πρέσες μπισκότων; Εξαρτήματα θερμομέτρων μαγειρικής; Θερμόμετρα μαγειρικής χρήσης; Χρονοδιακόπτες μαγειρέματος; Φλόγιστρα μαγειρικής; Σχάρες ψύξης; Σανίδες κοπής; Σχάρες πιάτων & επιφάνειες αποστράγγισης; Τροχοί ζύμης; Εξαρτήματα ηλεκτρικών μαχαιριών; Ηλεκτρικά μαχαίρια; Κόσκινα αλευριού; Στένσιλ φαγητού & ποτών; Θραύστες φαγητού; Διανομείς φαγητού; Τρίφτες & ξύστρες τροφίμων; Αποφλοιωτές & εργαλεία αφαίρεσης κουκουτσιών; Σακούλες ατμού τροφίμων; Καλαμάκια & σουβλάκια; Χωνιά; Πρέσες σκόρδου; Καλούπια ζελέ; Θήκες για παγάκια; Ανοιχτήρια βάζων; Συσκευές ωμού κιμά; Μαχαίρια κουζίνας; Καλούπια κουζίνας; Οργανωτές κουζίνας; Ζυγαριές κουζίνας; Ξύστρες κουζίνας; Ψαλίδια κουζίνας; Κόφτες κουζίνας; Σετ εργαλείων κουζίνας; Κουτάλες; Πολτοποιητές; Μεζούρες & κουτάλια μέτρησης; Σκεύη για μαλάκωμα του κρέατος; Μπολ ανάμειξης; Γουδιά & γουδοχέρια; Διανομείς λαδιού & ξυδιού; Σακούλες φούρνου; Γάντια χωρίς χωρίσματα φούρνου & στηρίγματα κατσαρόλας; Καλούπια & σφραγίδες ζυμαρικών; Μίξερ ζύμης; Υφάσματα ζύμης; Αξεσουάρ κόφτη πίτσας; Κόφτες πίτσας; Πολτοποιητές τροφίμων; Αξεσουάρ για πλάστη; Πλάστες; Μίξερ & σέικερ για σάλτσες σαλάτας; Στραγγιστήρες σαλάτας; Κουτάλες/σέσουλες; Θήκες νεροχύτη; Πατάκια & πλέγματα νεροχύτη; Τρυπητές κουτάλες; Σπάτουλες; Αξεσουάρ μύλων μπαχαρικών; Μύλοι μπαχαρικών; Σπιραλιζέρ; Βάσεις κουταλιών; Διανομείς ζάχαρης; Σκεύη για σούσι; Σουρωτήρια τσαγιού; Λαβίδες; Χτυπητήρια
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Narzędzia i sprzęty kuchenne: Fartuszki; Łopaty do pieca; Pipety do polewania mięsa; Pędzle spożywcze; Dystrybutory do napojów; Dozowniki masła; Przybory do dekorowania ciast; Łopatki do ciast; Zgniatarki do puszek; Otwieracze do puszek; Widelce do drobiu; Obieraki do cytrusów; Durszlaki i sitka; Dozowniki przypraw; Foremki do ciastek; Rękawy cukiernicze; Akcesoria do termometrów kuchennych; Termometry spożywcze; Minutniki kuchenne; Opalarki kuchenne; Kratki pod gorące naczynia; Deski do krojenia; Stojaki na naczynia i suszarki do naczyń; Noże do ciasta; Akcesoria do noży elektrycznych; Noże elektryczne; Sitka do mąki; Szablony do potraw i napojów; Szczypce do rozłupywania; Dozowniki spożywcze; Tarki i skrobaki do żywności; Obieraczki i wydrążacze; Torebki do gotowania na parze; Patyczki i rożna do żywności; Lejki; Wyciskarki do czosnku; Formy do żelatyny; Tacki do kostek lodu; Otwieracze do słoików; Porcjowniki mięsa suszonego „jerky”; Noże kuchenne; Formy kuchenne; Organizery kuchenne; Wagi kuchenne; Skrobaczki kuchenne; Nożyce kuchenne; Krajalnice kuchenne; Zestawy przyborów kuchennych; Chochle; Tłuczki do ziemniaków; Miarki i łyżki do odmierzania; Tłuczki do mięsa; Miski kuchenne; Moździerze i tłuczki; Dozowniki oleju i octu; Rękawy do pieczenia; Rękawice kuchenne; Foremki i pieczątki do makaronu; Siekacze do ciasta; Ściereczki do pieczenia ciasta; Akcesoria do noży do pizzy; Noże do pizzy; Praski; Akcesoria do wałków; Wałki do ciasta; Miksery i shakery do dressingów do sałatek; Osuszacze do sałaty; Łyżki do nabierania; Pojemniki do zlewozmywaków; Maty i kratki do zlewu; Łyżki durszlakowe; Płaskie łopatki; Akcesoria do młynków do przypraw; Młynki do przypraw; Spiralizery; Podpórki na łyżki; Dozowniki cukru; Maty do sushi; Zaparzacze do herbaty; Szczypce; Trzepaczki
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjska orodja in pripomočki: Predpasniki; Loparji za peko; Brizgalke; Čopiči za peko; Dozatorji za pijačo; Dozirniki za maslo; Dodatki za okraševanje tort; Podstavki za torte; Drobilci pločevink; Odpirači za pločevinke; Vilice za meso; Kanalni noži; Cedila in sita; Dozatorji za začimbe; Rezalniki za piškote; Stiskalniki za piškote; Dodatki za kuhinjski termometer; Kuhinjski termometri; Časovniki za kuhanje; Kuhinjski gorilniki; Hladilna stojala; Deske za rezanje; Stojala za sušenje posode in odcejalniki; Rezalna kolesa za testo; Dodatki za električne nože; Električni noži; Sita za moko; Šablone za hrano in pijačo; Klešče za hrano; Dozirniki za hrano; Strgala in strgalniki za živila; Lupilniki in izkoščičevalci; Vrečke za soparjenje hrane; Palčke in nabodala za živila; Lijaki; Stiskalniki za česen; Kalupi za želatino; Posodice za ledene kocke; Odpirači za kozarce; Stroji za izdelavo govejih trakcev; Kuhinjski noži; Kuhinjski kalupi; Kuhinjski organizatorji; Kuhinjske tehtnice; Kuhinjska strgala; Kuhinjske škarje; Kuhinjski rezalniki; Kompleti kuhinjskih pripomočkov; Zajemalke; Tlačilci; Merilne skodelice in žlice; Mehčalci mesa; Sklede za mešanje; Možnarji in terilniki; Posode za olje in kis; Vrečke za pečico; Kuhinjske rokavice in držala za lonce; Kalupi in šablone za testenine; Mešalniki za pecivo; Podloge za peko; Dodatki za rezalnik za pico; Rezalniki za pico; Stiskalnice za pire; Dodatki za valjarje; Valjarji; Mešalniki in stresalniki za solatni preliv; Odcejalniki solate; Lopatke; Košarice za pomivalno korito; Podloge in rešetke za korita; Penovke; Lopatice; Dodatki za mlinčke za začimbe; Mlinčki za začimbe; Spiralizatorji; Podstavki za žlice; Razdelilniki sladkorja; Podloge za suši; Cedila za čaj; Klešče; Metlice
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방용품: 앞치마; 제과제빵용 대형 주걱; 배스터; 배스팅 브러시; 음료 디스펜서; 버터 디스펜서; 케이크 장식용품; 케이크 서버; 캔 압축기; 통조림 따개; 카빙 포크; 샤넬 나이프; 체; 양념 디스펜서; 쿠키 틀; 쿠키 프레스; 조리용 온도계 부대용품; 요리용 온도계; 요리용 타이머; 요리용 토치; 식힘망; 도마; 식기 건조대/배수판; 반죽 커터; 전기칼 부대용품; 전기칼; 가루 체; 식음료용 스텐실; 식품 크래커; 식품 디스펜서; 강판/제스터; 식품 껍질 제거기/심 제거기; 오븐/전자레인지용 스팀백; 스틱/꼬치; 깔대기; 마늘 다지기; 젤라틴 몰드; 얼음 트레이; 병뚜껑 오프너; 육포 제조기; 주방칼; 주방용 몰드; 주방 정리용품; 주방 저울; 주방용 긁개; 주방 가위; 주방용 슬라이서; 조리기구 세트; 국자; 매셔; 계량 컵/스푼; 고기 다짐기; 믹싱 볼; 절구/절굿공이; 오일/식초 디스펜서; 오븐백; 오븐/냄비용 장갑; 파스타 틀/스탬프; 페이스트리 블렌더; 제과/제빵용 천; 피자 커터 부대용품; 피자 커터; 라이서; 밀대 부대용품; 밀대; 드레싱 믹서/셰이커; 야채 탈수기; 스쿱; 수세미 받침대; 싱크대 매트/거름망; 슬롯 스푼; 스패튤라; 양념 분쇄기 부대용품; 양념 분쇄기; 스파이럴라이저; 수저받침; 설탕 디스펜서; 김발; 차 거름망; 집게; 거품기
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン用品・調理器具: エプロン; ピザピール; ベイスター; はけ; ドリンクディスペンサー; バターディスペンサー; 製菓デコレーション用品; ケーキサーバー; あき缶つぶし器; 缶切り・栓抜き; カービングフォーク; チャンネルナイフ; 水切りボウル・ざる; 調味料入れ; クッキー型; クッキープレス; 料理用温度計関連用品; 料理用温度計; キッチンタイマー; 料理用バーナー; ケーキクーラー; まな板; 水切りかご; パイカッター; 電動ナイフ関連用品; 電動ナイフ; 粉ふるい; 食品・飲料用ステンシル; 殻割り器; フードディスペンサー; おろし器; ピーラー・芯抜き器; スチーム料理用バッグ; 串; じょうご; にんにく絞り; ゼリー型; 製氷皿; 瓶オープナー; ジャーキーガン; 包丁; 料理用型; キッチン収納用品; キッチンスケール; キッチン用スクレーパー; キッチンバサミ; キッチンスライサー; キッチン用品セット; レードル・おたま; マッシャー; 計量カップ・計量スプーン; 肉たたき; ボウル; すり鉢・すりこぎ; オイル・ビネガー用ディスペンサー; オーブンバッグ; 鍋つかみ; パスタ型・パスタスタンプ; パイブレンダー; パン・ケーキ用マット; ピザカッター関連用品; ピザカッター; ライサー; めん棒関連用品; めん棒; ドレッシングシェーカー; サラダスピナー; スクープ; シンクポケット; シンクマット・シンクグリッド; 穴あきおたま; スパチュラ; スパイスミル関連用品; スパイスミル; スパイラライザー; お玉立て; 砂糖入れ; 巻き簾; 茶こし・ティーストレーナー; トング; 泡立て器
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės įrankiai: Prijuostės; Ližės; Pipetės padažui; Bastingo šepetėliai; Gėrimų dozatoriai; Sviesto dozatoriai; Tortų dekoravimo reikmenys; Torto mentelės; Skardinių suspaustuvai; Skardinių atidarytuvai; Mėsos pjaustymo šakutės; Peiliai citrusų žievelei skusti; Kiaurasamčiai ir sieteliai; Prieskonių dozatoriai; Sausainių formelės; Sausainių presai; Maisto termometrų priedai; Maisto termometrai; Maisto gaminimo laikmačiai; Kulinariniai degikliai; Aušinimo lentynos; Pjaustymo lentelės; Indų lentynos ir nuvarvinimo plokštės; Tešlos pjaustymo ratukai; Elektrinių peilių priedai; Elektriniai peiliai; Miltų sieteliai; Maisto ir gėrimų trafaretai; Maisto spaustukai; Maisto dozatoriai; Maisto trintuvės ir smulkios trintuvės; Maisto skustukai ir šerdžių išpjaustymo įrankiai; Maisto troškinimo garuose maišeliai; Maisto lazdelės ir iešmeliai; Piltuvėliai; Česnakų spaustukai; Želatinos formos; Ledo kubelių padėklai; Stiklainių atidarytuvai; Mėsos juostelių formavimo aparatai; Virtuviniai peiliai; Virtuvės formos; Virtuvės reikmenų dėklai; Virtuvės svarstyklės; Virtuvės grandikliai; Virtuvinės žirklės; Virtuvinės pjaustyklės; Virtuvės reikmenų rinkiniai; Samčiai; Grūstuvai; Matavimo puodeliai ir šaukštai; Mėsos plaktukai; Dubenys maišymui; Grūstuvės ir piestelės; Aliejaus ir acto dozatoriai; Orkaitės maišeliai; Orkaitės pirštinės ir puodų laikikliai; Makaronų formelės ir įspaudai; Tešlos maišytuvai; Kočiojimo audiniai; Picos peilių priedai; Picos peiliai; Bulvių spaustuvai; Kočėlų priedai; Kočėlai; Salotų padažų maišytuvai ir plaktuvai; Salotų džiovyklės; Kaušeliai; Kriauklių dėklai; Kriauklių kilimėliai ir grotelės; Kiaurasamčiai; Menteles; Prieskonių grūstuvių priedai; Prieskonių grūstuvės; Spiralizatoriai; Šaukštų atramos; Cukraus dozatoriai; Sušių kilimėliai; Arbatos sieteliai; Žnyplės; Šluotelės
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha: Aventais; Tábuas para assar; Colheres para gordura; Pincéis para assados; Dispensadores de bebidas; Dosadores de manteiga; Suprimentos para decoração de bolos; Espátulas para bolo; Trituradores de latas; Abridores de latas; Garfos para carne; Descascadores; Peneiras e escorredores; Recipiente para condimentos; Cortadores de biscoitos; Prensas de biscoito; Acessórios para termômetro de cozinha; Termômetros para cozinha; Temporizadores para cozinha; Tochas de cozinha; Prateleiras para esfriar alimentos; Tábuas de corte para cozinha; Escorredores de pratos e escoadores; Cortadores de massa; Acessórios para faca elétrica; Facas elétricas; Peneiras de farinha; Estêncil para comidas e bebidas; Moedores de alimentos; Armários para alimentos; Raladores descascadores; Descascadores de alimentos; Sacos para cozimento a vapor; Espetos; Funis; Espremedor de alho; Formas de gelatina; Formas de gelo; Abridor de potes; Pistolar para fazer tiras de carne seca; Facas de cozinha; Moldes para cozinha; Organizadores para cozinha; Balanças de cozinha; Raspadeiras de cozinha; Tesouras de cozinha; Fatiadores para cozinha; Conjuntos de utensílios para cozinha; Conchas para sopas; Espremedores de batata para cozinha; Xícaras e colheres dosadoras; Amaciantes de carne; Tigelas para preparo de alimentos; Pilões para moer; Porta-azeite e porta-vinagre; Sacos para forno; Luvas de forno e pegadores de panelas; Formas para massa; Liquidificadores para massas; Toalhas para pasteleria; Acessórios para cortador de pizza; Cortadores de pizza; Espremedores de batatas; Acessórios para rolos de massa; Rolos de massa; Misturadores para molho de salada; Centrífugas de salada; Conchas; Porta-utensílios de pia; Tapetes para pia; Escumadeiras; Espátulas; Acessórios para moedor de temperos; Moedor de temperos; Espiralizadores; Descansos para colheres; Açucareiros; Esteiras para sushi; Coadores de chá; Pegadores; Batedores de ovos
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Ustensiles et accessoires de cuisine: Tabliers; Planches à pizza; Poires à jus; Pinceaux à badigeonner; Distributeurs de boissons; Distributeurs de beurre; Fournitures pour décoration de gâteaux; Pelles à gâteaux; Écraseurs de canettes; Ouvre-boîtes; Fourchettes à découper; Couteaux à canal; Passoires et filtres; Distributeurs de condiments; Emporte-pièces; Presses à biscuits; Accessoires pour thermomètres de cuisson; Thermomètres de cuisson; Minuteurs de cuisson; Chalumeaux de cuisine; Supports de refroidissement; Planches à découper; Égouttoirs à vaisselle; Roulettes à pâtes; Accessoires pour couteaux électriques; Couteaux électriques; Tamis à farine; Pochoirs pour aliments et boissons; Écraseurs à aliments; Distributeurs d’aliments; Râpes et zesteurs; Éplucheurs et évideurs; Sacs de cuisson vapeur; Pics et brochettes alimentaires; Entonnoirs; Presse-ail; Moules à gélatine; Bacs à glaçons; Ouvre-bocaux; Pistolets à viande séchée; Couteaux de cuisine; Moules de cuisine; Rangements de cuisine; Balances de cuisine; Spatules et racloirs de cuisine; Ciseaux de cuisine; Trancheuses de cuisine; Coffrets d’ustensiles de cuisine; Louches; Presse-purée; Tasses & cuillères à mesurer; Attendrisseurs de viande; Bols mélangeurs; Mortiers et pilons; Huiliers et vinaigriers; Sacs de cuisson pour fours; Maniques et gants de cuisine; Moules et tampons pour pâtes; Découpoirs; Linges de pâtisserie; Accessoires de découpe de pizzas; Coupe-pizza; Presse-purées; Accessoires pour rouleaux à pâtisserie; Rouleaux à pâtisserie; Mélangeurs et shakers à vinaigrette; Essoreuses à salade; Pelles; Porte-éponges pour évier; Tapis d’évier; Cuillères à fentes; Spatules; Accessoires pour moulins à épices; Moulins à épices; Spiraliseurs; Porte-cuillères; Sucriers; Nattes à sushis; Passoires à thé; Pinces de cuisine; Batteurs
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Gereçleri ve Aletleri: Mutfak Önlükleri; Fırıncı Kürekleri; Damlalıklar; Yumurta Fırçaları; İçecek Sebilleri; Tereyağı Dağıtıcıları; Pasta Süsleme Malzemeleri; Pasta Servis Gereçleri; Konserve Kutusu Eziciler; Konserve Açıcılar; Et Servis Çatalları; Süsleme Bıçakları; Kevgirler ve Süzgeçler; Sos Dispenserleri; Kurabiye Kalıpları; Kurabiye Baskıları; Pişirme Termometresi Aksesuarları; Yemek Isıölçerleri; Pişirme Zamanlayıcıları; Mutfak Pürmüzleri; Yiyecek Soğutma Rafları; Kesme Tahtaları; Bulaşıklıklar ve Süzme Tezgahları; Hamur Tekerlek Kesiciler; Elektrikli Bıçak Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Bıçaklar; Un Elekleri; Yiyecek ve İçecek Kalıpları; Yiyecek Parçalayıcılar; Yiyecek Dispenserleri; Yiyecek Rendeleri ve Narenciye Soyacağı; Soyacaklar ve Oyacaklar; Gıda Buharda Pişirme Poşetleri; Yiyecek Çubuk ve Şişleri; Huniler; Sarmısak Eziciler; Jelatin Kalıplar; Buz Küpü Kalıpları; Kavanoz Açacakları; Et Tabancaları; Mutfak Bıçakları; Mutfak Kalıpları; Mutfak Düzenleyicileri; Mutfak Terazileri; Mutfak Spatulaları; Mutfak Makasları; Mutfak Dilimleyiciler; Mutfak Eşyası Setleri; Uzun Saplı Kepçeler; Eziciler; Ölçü Kapları ve Kaşıkları; Et Dövecekleri; Karıştırma Kapları; Havanlar ve Tokmaklar; Yağ ve Sirke Dispenserleri; Fırın Poşetleri; Fırın Eldivenleri ve Tutacaklar; Makarna Kalıpları ve Damgalar; Hamur Karıştırıcıları; Hamur Bezleri; Pizza Kesici Aksesuarları; Pizza Kesme Aletleri; Patates Rendeleri; Merdane Aksesuarları; Merdaneler; Salata Sosu Karıştırıcı ve Çalkalayıcıları; Salata Kurutucuları; Kepçeler; Lavabo Kenarı Düzenleyicileri; Lavabo Paspasları ve Izgaraları; Delikli Kaşıklar; Spatulalar; Baharat Değirmeni Aksesuarları; Baharat Değirmenleri; Spiral Doğrayıcılar; Kaşık Altlıkları; Şeker Dispenserleri; Suşi Matları; Çay Süzgeçleri; Maşalar; Çırpma Aletleri
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Strumenti e utensili cucina: Grembiuli; Pale da fornaio; Lardatoi; Spazzole per grasso; Erogatori di bevande; Distributori di burro; Forniture decorazioni torte; Palette da torta; Schiaccia lattine; Apri lattine; Forchettoni; Sbuccia arance; Scolapasta e colini; Dosatori per condimenti; Formine per biscotti; Stampi per biscotti; Accessori per termometri da cucina; Termometri da cucina; Timer da cottura; Torce da cucina; Cestelli per raffreddamento; Taglieri; Scolapiatti e piani di scolo; Tagliapasta; Accessori per coltelli elettrici; Coltelli elettrici; Setacci per farina; Stencil per alimenti e bevande; Tritatutto; Dispenser per alimenti; Grattugia e grattugialimoni; Pelatrici e snocciolatrici; Sacchetti per la cottura a vapore; Stecchi e spiedi per alimenti; Imbuti; Spremiaglio; Stampi per gelatina; Vaschette del ghiaccio; Apriscatole; Pistola per strisce di carne essiccata; Coltelli da cucina; Stampi da cucina; Armadi da cucina; Bilance da cucina; Raschietti da cucina; Cesoie da cucina; Affettatrici da cucina; Set utensili da cucina; Mestoli; Schiacciapatate; Tazzine e cucchiaini misurazione; Inteneritore per carne; Recipienti per miscelazione; Mortai e pestelli; Oliere e acetiere; Sacchetti da forno; Guanti da forno e presine; Stampi e forme per pasta; Mixer da pasticcere; Panni per pasticceria; Accessori per tagliapizza; Tagliapizza; Passapatate; Accessori per mattarelli; Mattarelli; Miscelatori per condimento insalata; Centrifughe per insalata; Cucchiai da servizio; Portaoggetti per lavandino; Tappetini  e griglie per lavello; Schiumarole; Spatole; Accessori macina spezie; Macina spezie; Spiralizzatori; Portacucchiai; Dispensatori di zucchero; Stuoie per sushi; Filtri per il tè; Pinze da cucina; Fruste da cucina
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai eszközök és edények: Kötények; Sütőlapátok; Szaftlocsolók; Kenőecsetek; Italadagolók; Vajadagolók; Tortadíszítő kellékek; Tortalapátok; Konzervpréselők; Konzervnyitók; Faragóvillák; Csatornakések; Szűrőedények és szűrők; Fűszeradagolók; Süteményvágók; Süteményprések; Főzésihőmérő-kiegészítők; Főzési hőmérők; Főzésidőzítők; Főzőfáklyák; Hűtőállványok; Vágódeszkák; Edénytartók és lefolyódeszkák; Tésztakerekek; Elektromoskés-kiegészítők; Elektromos kések; Lisztsziták; Étel- és italsablonok; Ételkekszek; Élelmiszer-adagolók; Élelmiszer-reszelők és -zúzók; Élelmiszer-hámozók és -magozók; Ételpároló zacskók; Élelmiszer-pálcák és -nyársak; Tölcsérek; Fokhagymaprések; Zselatinformák; Jégkockatálcák; Üvegnyitók; Szárítotthús-pisztolyok; Konyhakések; Konyhai formák; Konyhaszervezők; Konyhai mérlegek; Konyhai kaparók; Konyhai ollók; Konyhai szeletelők; Konyhaiedény-készletek; Merőkanalak; Pürésítők; Mérőpoharak és -kanalak; Húsfinomítók; Keverőtálak; Törőedények és mozsarak; Olaj- és ecetadagolók; Sütőtáskák; Sütőkesztyűk és fazéktartók; Tésztaformák és -bélyegek; Tésztakeverők; Tésztakendők; Pizzavágó-kiegészítők; Pizzavágók; Darálók; Sodrófa-kiegészítők; Sodrófák; Salátaöntet-keverők és -rázók; Salátakeverők; Fagyis kanalak; Mosogatótartók; Mosogatószőnyegek és -rácsok; Lyukas kanalak; Spatulák; Fűszerdaráló-kiegészítők; Fűszerdarálók; Spirálvágók; Kanáltámaszok; Cukoradagolók; Sushi-szőnyegek; Teaszűrők; Csipeszek; Habverők
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchenhelfer & -utensilien: Schürzen; Backschaufeln; Bratenspritzen; Backpinsel; Getränkespender; Butterportionierer; Kuchen-Dekorationsbedarf; Tortenheber; Dosenpressen; Dosenöffner; Fleischgabeln; Ziseliermesser; Abtropf- & Küchensiebe; Saucenspender; Ausstechförmchen; Keksmaschine; Küchenthermometer-Zubehör; Kochthermometer; Kurzzeitmesser & Eieruhren; Flambierbrenner; Abkühlgitter; Schneidebretter; Geschirrständer & Abtropfflächen; Teigräder; Elektromesserzubehör; Elektromesser; Mehlsiebe; Lebensmittelschablonen; Spezialbesteck & Nussknacker; Nahrungsmittelspender; Reiben; Schäler & Entkerner; Dampfgarbeutel; Allespicker & Spieße; Küchentrichter; Knoblauchpressen; Dessertformen; Eiswürfelformen; Deckelöffner; Fleischpistolen; Küchenmesser; Küchenformen; Küchenorganizer; Küchenwaage; Küchenschaber; Küchenscheren; Küchenschneidegeräte; Küchenutensilien-Sets; Kellen; Stampfer; Messbecher & Dosierlöffel; Fleischklopfer; Rührschüsseln; Mörser & Stößel; Essig- & Ölspender; Bratschläuche; Topfhandschuhe & Topflappen; Pastaförmchen & -stempel; Teigmischer; Teigtücher; Pizzaschneider-Zubehör; Pizzaschneider; Kartoffelpressen; Teigrollenzubehör; Teigrollen; Dressing-Shaker; Salatschleudern; Portionierer; Spülbeckenkörbe; Spülbeckenmatten & -gitter; Schaumlöffel; Pfannenwender; Zubehör für Gewürzmühlen; Gewürzmühlen; Spiralschneider; Löffelablagen; Zuckerspender; Sushi-Matten; Teesiebe; Zange; Schneebesen
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房工具/用具: 围裙; 烘培铲; 滴管; 涂油刷/烧烤刷; 饮料机; 黄油分配器; 蛋糕装饰用品; 蛋糕铲; 压罐器; 开罐器; 熟食固定餐叉/切肉餐叉; 蔬果刨丝刀; 滤锅/漏勺; 调味盒; 饼干/烘焙切压模具; 曲奇枪; 烹饪温度计配件; 烹炒温度计/食品温度计; 烹饪定时器; 厨用喷火枪; 冷却架; 切菜板; 沥水碗碟架; 厨房用轮刀; 电动刀配件; 电动刀; 面粉筛; 食品图案/饮料拉花模板; 食品夹; 食品分配器; 擦菜板/刨丝刀/刮丝器; 削皮刀; 食品蒸煮袋; 烤/炸串签子; 漏斗; 压蒜器; 果冻模具; 冰格; 开罐器; 挤肉枪; 厨房用刀; 厨房模具; 厨房收纳器具; 厨房秤; 铲刀/刮刀; 厨房剪刀; 食品切片机; 厨房用具套装; 长柄勺; 捣碎器; 量杯/量勺; 肉锤/松肉针/嫩肉器; 搅拌碗; 杵臼; 油壶/醋瓶; 烤箱袋; 烤箱手套/隔热垫; 面食模具/印模; 面粉搅拌器; 糕点布; 披萨刀配件; 比萨刀; 压薯器/压粒器; 擀面杖配件; 擀面杖; 沙拉酱搅拌瓶/调味瓶; 沙拉搅拌机; 铲子/勺子; 水槽沥水盒/袋; 水槽垫/网; 篦式漏勺; 抹刀/刮勺; 调料研磨机配件; 调料研磨机; 螺旋切丝器; 匙架; 糖罐; 寿司帘; 滤茶器; 钳; 打蛋器
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski alati i pribor: Pregače; Kore za pečenje; Pipete za nadjev; Kistovi za nadjev; Dozatori za piće; Dozatori za maslac; Pribor za ukrašavanje torti; Poslužavnici za kolače; Drobilice za limenke; Otvarači za limenke; Vilice za rezbarenje; Spiralizator noževi; Sita i cjedila; Dozatori umaka; Rezači za kolačiće; Preše za kolačiće; Pribor za kulinarske termometre; Kulinarski termometri; Tajmeri za kuhanje; Breneri za flambiranje; Rešetke za hlađenje; Daske za rezanje; Stalci za suđe i odvodne ploče; Kotači za tijesto; Pribor za električne noževe; Električni noževi; Sita za brašno; Šablone za hranu i piće; Kliješta za hranu; Dozatori za hranu; Ribeži i nožići za koru; Gulilice i vadilice koštica; Vrećice za kuhanje hrane na pari; Štapići i ražnjići za hranu; Lijevci; Preše za češnjak; Kalupi za želatinu; Posude za kockice leda; Otvarači za staklenke; Pištolji za mljeveno meso; Kuhinjski noževi; Kuhinjski kalupi; Kuhinjski organizatori; Kuhinjske vage; Kuhinjske strugalice; Kuhinjske škare; Kuhinjski rezači; Kompleti kuhinjskog pribora; Kutlače; Gnječilice; Mjerne posude i žlice; Batovi za meso; Zdjele za miješanje; Tarionici i tučci; Dozatori za ulje i ocat; Vrećice za pečenje; Rukavice za pećnicu i držači za lonce; Kalupi i pečati za tjesteninu; Miješalice za tijesto; Slastičarske krpe; Pribor za rezače za pizzu; Rezači za pizzu; Pasirke; Pribor za valjke za tijesto; Valjci za tijesto; Mikseri i posude za preljeve za salatu; Posude za sušenje salate; Žlice grabilice; Police za sudoper; Podloške i rešetke za sudoper; Perforirane žlice; Spatule; Pribor za mlince za začine; Mlinci za začine; Spiralizatori; Nasloni za žlice; Dozatori za šećer; Podloge za sushi; Cjedila za čaj; Hvataljke; Pjenjače
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské nástroje a vybavení: Zástěry; Pekařské lopaty; Pečicí obaly; Štětce na pečení; Dávkovače na nápoje; Dávkovače másla; Potřeby pro zdobení cukroví; Lopatky na dorty; Drtiče na plechovky; Otvíráky na konzervy; Vidličky na porcování masa; Škrábací nože; Cedníky a filtry; Dávkovače ochucovadel; Vykrajovátka na cukroví; Lisy na cukroví; Kuchyňské teploměry – příslušenství; Kuchyňské teploměry; Kuchyňské minutky; Flambovací pistole; Chladicí regály; Prkénka na krájení; Odkapávače nádobí; Kolečka na těsto; Elektrické nože – příslušenství; Elektrické nože; Síta na mouku; Šablony na nápoje a jídla; Kleště na potraviny; Dávkovače potravin; Struhadla a škrabadla; Škrabky a vykrajovátka; Varné sáčky; Špejle a jehly na potraviny; Trychtýře; Lisy na česnek; Želatinové formy; Formy na led; Otvíráky na sklenice; Plničky na párky a sušené maso; Kuchyňské nože; Formy na vaření a pečení; Kuchyňské pořadače; Kuchyňské váhy; Kuchyňské stěrky; Kuchyňské nůžky; Kuchyňské kráječe; Sady kuchyňského náčiní; Naběračky; Mačkadla; Odměrné hrníčky a lžičky; Paličky na maso; Salátové mísy; Hmoždíře a paličky; Nádoby na olej a ocet; Pečicí sáčky; Chňapky na plechy a držáky na hrnce; Formy a vyřezávače na těstoviny; Hnětače těsta; Papír na pečení cukroví; Kráječe na pizzu – příslušenství; Nože na pizzu; Pasírovače; Válečky – příslušenství; Válečky; Mixéry a šejkry na salátové dresingy; Salátovače; Velké lžíce; Odkládací nádobky ke dřezu; Podložky do dřezu; Odkapávací lžíce; Obracečky; Mlýnky na koření – příslušenství; Mlýnky na koření; Spiralizéry; Stojánky na vařečku; Dávkovače na cukr; Podložky na suši; Čajová sítka; Kleště na vaření; Šlehací metly
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nhà bếp: Tạp dề; Xẻng pizza; Dụng cụ rót nước sốt; Cọ phết dầu, gia vị; Bình đựng nước giải khát; Dụng cụ cắt bơ; Dụng cụ trang trí bánh; Nêm bánh; Máy cán vỏ lon; Đồ khui hộp; Dĩa xiên; Dao tạo sợi; Rây thực phẩm; Hộp đựng chia ngăn; Khuôn cắt bánh quy; Dụng cụ tạo hình bánh; Phụ kiện nhiệt kế nấu ăn; Nhiệt kế nấu ăn; Đồng hồ hẹn giờ nấu; Đèn khò nấu ăn; Giá làm mát; Thớt; Kệ úp chén & khay rãnh trượt ráo nước; Dụng cụ cắt bánh rán; Phụ kiện dao điện; Dao điện; Ca ray bột; Khuôn thực phẩm và đồ uống; Kềm tách vỏ, kẹp cua; Hộp đựng và chia thực phẩm; Dụng cụ bào & nạo sợi; Dụng cụ gọt & lấy lõi trái cây; Túi chịu nhiệt; Que xiên thực phẩm; Phễu; Dụng cụ ép tỏi; Khuôn gelatin; Khay đá; Dụng cụ mở nắp lọ; Súng làm xúc xích; Dao nhà bếp; Khuôn bếp; Kệ bếp; Cân nhà bếp; Dụng cụ cạo, vét nấu nướng; Dụng cụ xén; Dụng cụ cắt thái; Bộ đồ dùng nhà bếp; Muôi; Vá nghiền thực phẩm; Ly, muỗng định lượng; Dụng cụ dầm thịt; Bát trộn; Cối và chày; Bình đổ dầu và giấm; Túi đựng trong lò nướng; Găng tay khi đun lò và miếng lót nồi; Khuôn và dấu làm mỳ pasta; Dụng cụ nhào bột; Tấm nướng vải lót bánh; Phụ kiện dao cắt pizza; Dao cắt bánh pizza; Dụng cụ ép rau quả; Phụ kiện trục lăn; Dụng cụ lăn, cán bột; Lọ/hũ trộn và lắc salad; Rổ quay rau; Muỗng xúc; Hộp đựng đồ ở bồn rửa bát; Miếng và tấm lót chậu rửa bát; Muôi thủng; Xẻng lật thức ăn; Phụ kiện máy nghiền gia vị; Dụng cụ nghiền gia vị; Dụng cụ cắt xoắn ốc; Giá để thìa; Lọ rắc đường; Mành cuốn sushi; Bộ lọc chè; Kẹp gắp thức ăn; Dụng cụ đánh bông
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha: Aventais; Pás de forno; Pipetas conta-gotas; Pincéis de cozinha; Dispensadores de bebidas; Dispensadores de manteiga; Acessórios para decoração de bolos; Talheres para servir bolo; Esmagadores de latas; Abre-latas; Garfos de trinchar; Cortador tipo descascador (fitas); Escorredores e coadores; Dispensador de condimentos; Cortadores de bolachas; Prensas para bolachas; Acessórios de termómetro de cozinha; Termómetros de cozinha; Cronómetros de cozinha; Maçaricos de cozinha; Tabuleiros de arrefecimento; Tábuas de cortar; Escorredores de louça e bandejas de escorrer; Rolos corta-massas; Acessórios para facas elétricas; Facas elétricas; Peneiras para farinha; Stencils de comida e bebida; Abridores/descascadores; Dispensador de alimentos; Raladores e raspadores de alimentos; Descascadores e descaroçadores; Sacos para cozinhar a vapor; Pauzinhos e espetos para alimentos; Funis; Espremedor de alho; Moldes para gelatina; Bandejas para cubos de gelo; Abre-frascos; Pistolas para carne seca; Facas de cozinha; Formas de bolos; Organizadores para cozinha; Balanças de cozinha; Espátulas de cozinha; Tesoura de cozinha; Cortadores de cozinha; Conjuntos de utensílios de cozinha; Conchas; Esmagadores; Chávenas e colheres medidoras; Amaciadores de carne; Tigelas para misturar; Almofarizes e pilões; Dispensadores de azeite e vinagre; Sacos para cozinhar no forno; Luvas para forno e pegas para panelas; Moldes e carimbos para pasta; Misturadores de massa; Panos para massa; Acessórios para cortador de pizza; Cortadores de pizza; Esmagador de batatas; Acessórios de rolo de cozinha; Rolos de cozinha; Misturadores e agitadores de molho de salada; Escorredores rotativos de salada; Colheres fundas; Organizadores para lava-louça; Tapetes e grelhas para lava-louça; Escumadeiras; Espátulas; Acessórios para moinho de especiarias; Moinhos de especiarias; Espiralizadores; Suportes para colher; Açucareiros; Tapetes para sushi; Filtros de chá; Tenazes; Batedores
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Instrumente și ustensile de bucătărie: Șorțuri; Suporturi pentru copt; Poș sos pentru friptură; Pensule sos pentru friptură; Dozatoare pentru băuturi; Dispensere pentru unt; Accesorii pentru decorarea prăjiturilor; Palete pentru servit tort; Dispozitive zdrobire doze; Deschizătoare de conserve; Furculițe pentru friptură; Cuțite circulare; Site și strecurători; Dozatoare condimente; Forme pentru tăiat fursecuri; Prese pentru tăiat fursecuri; Accesorii termometre pentru gătit; Termometre pentru gătit; Temporizatoare pentru gătit; Arzător pentru gătit; Grilaje pentru răcire; Tocătoare; Suporturi pentru vase și suporturi de scurgere; Roți pentru aluat; Accesorii cuțit electric; Cuțite electrice; Site pentru cernut făina; Șabloane decorative pentru alimente și băuturi; Dispozitive pentru zdrobit; Dozatoare de alimente; Răzători și răzători pentru coajă; Ustensile pentru curățat coaja și îndepărtat miezul; Pungi pentru preparare alimente la abur; Bețișoare și frigărui pentru alimente; Pâlnii; Prese pentru usturoi; Forme pentru gelatină; Tăvi pentru cuburi de gheață; Deschizătoare pentru borcane; Presă pentru pastramă uscată; Cuțite de bucătărie; Forme pentru bucătărie; Organizatoare pentru bucătărie; Cântare de bucătărie; Raclete pentru bucătărie; Foarfeci de bucătărie; Aparate de feliat de bucătărie; Seturi de ustensile de bucătărie; Polonice; Prese pentru zdrobit; Căni și linguri pentru măsurat; Dispozitive pentru frăgezit carnea; Boluri pentru amestecare; Mojare și pistiluri; Dozatoare pentru ulei și oțet; Pungi pentru cuptor; Mănuși pentru cuptor și suporturi pentru oale; Forme și ștampile pentru paste; Blendere pentru patiserie; Pânze pentru patiserie; Accesorii pentru dispozitive pentru tăiat pizza; Dispozitive pentru tăiat pizza; Dispozitive pentru mărunțit; Accesorii sucitor; Sucitoare; Mixere și shakere pentru dressing salată; Uscătoare pentru salată; Linguri speciale; Suporturi pentru produse pentru chiuvete; Covorașe și grilaje pentru chiuvete; Palete perforate; Spatule; Accesorii pentru râșniță pentru condimente; Râșnițe pentru condimente; Spiralizatoare; Suporturi pentru linguri; Zaharnițe; Covoraș pentru rulat sushi; Strecurători pentru ceai; Clești; Teluri
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Herramientas y utensilios de cocina: Delantales; Palas de horno; Pipetas para salsas; Pinceles de cocina; Dispensadores de bebidas; Dispensadores de mantequilla; Productos para la decoración de pasteles; Palas para pasteles; Aplastadores de latas; Abrelatas; Tenedores trinchantes; Acanaladores; Coladores y filtros; Dispensadores de condimentos; Moldes de galletas; Prensa para galletas; Accesorios para termómetros de cocina; Termómetros de cocina; Cronómetros de cocina; Soplete para cocinar; Parrillas de enfriamiento; Tablas de cortar; Escurreplatos; Cortapastas extensibles con ruedas; Accesorios para cuchillos eléctricos; Cuchillos eléctricos; Tamices de harina; Plantillas para comida y bebida; Tenazas para alimentos; Dispensadores de comida; Ralladores de comida; Peladores y descorazonadores; Bolsas de cocción al vapor; Pinchos y brochetas para comida; Embudos; Prensadores de ajos; Moldes para gelatina; Bandejas cubiteras; Abridores de frascos; Pistolas para cecinas; Cuchillos de cocina; Moldes de cocina; Organizadores de cocina; Básculas de cocina; Raspadores de cocina; Tijeras de cocina; Cortadoras de cocina; Juegos de utensilios de cocina; Cucharones; Trituradores; Tazas y cucharas medidoras; Ablandadores de carne; Cuencos para mezclar; Morteros; Vinagreras; Bolsas para horno; Apartadores y guantes para horno; Moldes y sellos para pasta; Amasadores; Paños de amasar; Accesorios para cortapizzas; Cortadores de pizza; Pasapurés; Accesorios para rodillos de cocina; Rodillos de cocina; Mezcladores de aliños; Escurridores de ensalada; Cucharas para bolas; Organizadores de fregadero; Esteras antideslizantes para fregaderos; Espumaderas; Espátulas de cocina; Accesorios de molinillo para especias; Molinillos para especias; Espiralizadores; Reposacucharas; Azucareros; Esterillas para sushi; Coladores de té; Tenazas; Batidores de varillas
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukengereedschap: Schorten; Pizzascheppen; Pipetten voor bedruipen; Bakkwasten; Drankdispensers; Boterdispensers; Benodigdheden voor taartversiering; Taartscheppen; Blikpersen; Blikopeners; Vleesvorken; Citrusschillers; Vergieten en zeven; Specerijdispensers; Koekjesvormen; Koekjespersen; Accessoires voor kookthermometers; Kookthermometers; Kookwekkers; Kookbranders; Afkoelroosters; Snijplanken; Bordenrekken en afdruiprekken; Deegwielen; Accessoires voor elektrische messen; Elektrische messen; Zeven voor bloem; Culinaire strooisjablonen; Voedselkrakers; Voedselautomaten; Voedselraspen en zesteurs; Schilmessen en appelboren; Stoomzakken; Prikkers en spiezen voor voedsel; Trechters; Knoflookpersen; Gelatinevormen; Bakjes voor ijsblokjes; Potopeners; Jerky-pistolen; Keukenmessen; Kookvormen; Keukenopbergsystemen; Keukenweegschalen; Keukenschrapers; Grote keukenscharen; Keukensnijders; Keukengereisets; Soeplepels; Stampers; Maatbekers en maatlepels; Vleeshamers; Mengkommen; Vijzels; Olie- en azijnstellen; Braadzakken; Ovenwanten; Pastavormen; Deegmixer; Bladerdeeg; Accessoires voor pizzasnijders; Pizzasnijders; Grove zeven; Accessoires voor deegrollers; Deegrollers; Shakebekers voor saladedressing; Slacentrifuges; Opscheplepels; Gootsteenbakjes; Gootsteenmatten; Lepels met sleuven; Spatels; Accessoires voor specerijmolens; Specerijmolens; Spiraalsnijders; Lepelleggers; Suikerdispensers; Sushimatjes; Theezeefjes; Tangen; Gardes
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная утварь: Фартуки; Пекарские лопаты; Кухонные спринцовки; Кисточки для смазывания; Диспенсеры для напитков; Диспенсеры для масла; Товары для украшения тортов; Лопатки для тортов; Прессы для алюминиевых банок; Консервные ножи; Вилки для разделки мяса; Ножи-декораторы; Дуршлаги и сита; Дозаторы для соусов и приправ; Формочки для печенья; Прессы для печенья; Аксессуары для кулинарных термометров; Кулинарные термометры; Кухонные таймеры; Кулинарные горелки; Решетки для охлаждения выпечки; Разделочные доски; Сушилки для посуды и поддоны; Роликовые ножи для теста; Аксессуары для электроножей; Электроножи; Кружки-сита для муки; Трафареты для украшения блюд и напитков; Орехоколы и щипцы для лобстеров и крабов; Диспенсеры для сыпучих продуктов; Терки; Овощечистки и ножи для удаления сердцевины плодов; Пакеты-пароварки; Кулинарные шампуры и шпажки; Воронки; Чеснокодавилки; Формы для желе; Формы для льда; Открывалки для банок; Пистолеты для фарша; Кухонные ножи; Кулинарные формы; Кухонные органайзеры; Кухонные весы; Кухонные скребки; Кухонные ножницы; Кухонные слайсеры; Наборы кухонной утвари; Половники; Толкушки для картофеля; Мерные стаканы и ложки; Молотки для отбивания мяса; Миски для смешивания; Ступки и пестики; Диспенсеры для масла и уксуса; Рукава для запекания; Прихватки; Формы и печати для пасты; Измельчители для теста; Ткань для расстойки теста; Аксессуары для ножей для пиццы; Ножи для пиццы; Прессы для приготовления пюре; Аксессуары для скалок; Скалки; Миксеры и шейкеры для салатных заправок; Центрифуги для сушки зелени; Кухонные ложки и совки; Органайзеры для кухонной раковины; Коврики и решетки для раковин; Шумовки; Кухонные лопатки; Аксессуары для мельниц для специй; Мельницы для специй; Спирализаторы; Подставки под ложку; Дозаторы для сахара; Коврики для суши; Чайные ситечки; Щипцы; Венчики
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiövälineet ja tarvikkeet: Esiliinat; Leivontalapiot; Kostuttajat; Voitelusudit; Juoma-annostelijat; Voin annostelijat; Kakunkoristelutarvikkeet; Kakkulapiot; Tölkkipuristimet; Tölkinavaajat; Lihahaarukat; Koristeluveitset; Läviköt ja siivilät; Mausteannostelijat; Piparimuotit; Keksipursottimet; Ruuanlaittolämpömittarin lisätarvikkeet; Lämpömittarit ruuanlaittoon; Munakellot; Kaasupolttimet; Viilennystelineet; Leikkuulaudat; Astia- ja kuivaustelineet; Taikinapyörät; Sähköveitsien lisätarvikkeet; Sähköveitset; Jauhosihdit; Ruoka- ja juomasapluunat; Ruuan särkijät; Ruoka-automaatit; Raastinraudat ja -puikot; Kuorimaveitset ja hedelmäporat; Höyrytyspussit; Grilli- ja varrastikut; Suppilot; Valkosipulipuristimet; Hyytelömuotit; Jääpalamuotit; Purkinavaajat; Jerky-pistooli; Keittiöveitset; Muotit ja vuoat; Keittiösäilytys; Keittiövaa'at; Lastat; Keittiösakset; Keittiön siivutuskoneet; Keittiövälinesetit; Kauhat; Survimet; Mitat ja mittalusikat; Lihan mureuttajat; Sekoituskulhot; Morttelit ja survimet; Öljy- ja etikkapullot; Paistopussit; Uunikintaat ja pannulaput; Pastamuotit ja -leimat; Taikinaraudat; Taikinaliinat; Pizzaleikkurin lisätarvikkeet; Pizzaleikkurit; Puristimet; Kaulintarvikkeet; Kaulimet; Salaatinkastikeen sekoittimet; Salaattilingot; Kauhavälineet; Tiskiallastelineet; Tiskiallasalustat ja -ritilät; Reikäkauhat; Paistinlastat; Maustemyllyjen lisätarvikkeet; Maustemyllyt; Spiraalileikkurit; Kauhan alustat; Sokeriautomaatit; Sushimatot; Teesiivilät; Keittiöpihdit; Vispilät
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房工具和用具: 圍裙; 烘焙鏟; 淋油器; 醬料刷; 飲料機; 奶油切割分配器; 蛋糕裝飾用品; 蛋糕鏟; 鋁罐壓扁機; 開罐器; 餐叉; 雕刻刀; 濾籃/濾器; 調味罐; 餅乾模具; 餅乾擠花器; 烹飪溫度計配件; 烹飪溫度計; 料理計時器; 料理噴槍; 冷卻架; 砧板; 碗碟架/瀝水盤; 麵糰輪刀; 電動刀配件; 電動刀; 麵粉篩; 粉篩模具組; 剝殼器/鉗子; 食物分配器; 削皮器/磨泥器; 削皮器/去核器; 蒸煮包裝袋; 食物串籤/肉串籤; 漏斗; 搗蒜器; 果凍模具; 製冰盒; 開罐輔助器; 擠肉槍; 廚房用刀; 廚房模具; 廚房收納用品; 廚房電子秤; 廚房刮刀; 廚房剪刀; 廚房切菜器; 廚房工具組; 湯勺; 搗碎器; 量杯/量匙; 肉嫩化器; 攪拌碗; 研磨缽和研磨杵; 油罐/醋罐; 烤箱調理袋; 隔熱手套; 義大利麵模具/壓花; 奶油切刀; 糕點用布; 披薩切割刀配件; 披薩切割刀; 壓泥器; 桿麵棍配件; 桿麵棍; 沙拉醬調理瓶罐; 沙拉蔬菜甩水器; 挖勺; 流理槽置物盒; 水槽墊; 漏勺; 刮鏟; 香料研磨機配件; 香料研磨器; 螺旋切絲器; 湯勺架; 糖罐; 壽司墊; 濾茶器; 夾子; 打蛋器/攪拌器